Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.130

Plan of conversion—Prohibited provisions.

The plan of conversion shall contain no provision which the director determines to be inequitable or detrimental to the applicant, its savings account holders, or other savings banks or to be contrary to the public interest.

[ 1994 c 92 s 359; 1981 c 85 s 25.]